Virginia statutes. Title 7.1. Boundaries, Jurisdiction and Emblems of the Commonwealth.
§§ 7.1-1 through 7.1-43.

Repealed by Acts 2005, c. 839, cl. 10, effective October 1, 2005.

Cross references.

For provisions relating to recodification of

Titles 1

and 7.1, see Editor’s notes under §

1-200

. For similar provisions, see the tables of corresponding former and new sections in Volume 10.